Colorado statutes. TITLE 2 Legislative
PART 16
LEGISLATIVE DEPARTMENT CASH FUND

Editor's note:

This part 16 was numbered as part 14 in House Bill 09-1348 but has been renumbered on revision for ease of location.

2-2-1601. Legislative department cash fund - redistricting accounts - creation - definition.

There is hereby created in the state treasury the legislative department cash fund. Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (1), the fund shall be comprised of such moneys that the general assembly, the house of representatives, the senate, or any legislative service agency accepts as gifts, grants, or donations, collects or otherwise receives from private and public sources, and any other moneys appropriated or transferred to the fund.

Moneys collected or received from the following sources shall not be credited to the fund:

Any moneys generated from the sale of bill boxes, legislative directories, and publications and other services provided by the print shop;

Any moneys received from various departments for audits and studies;

Any moneys received as payment of costs and fees pursuant to section 2-5-118 (2) or (2.5); and

Any moneys generated from the sale of publications and memorabilia relating to the state capitol building pursuant to section 24-82-108 (3)(f)(I), C.R.S.

All interest earned on the investment of moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund. Any moneys credited to the fund and unexpended at the end of any given fiscal year shall remain in the fund and shall not revert to the general fund.

Except for money in the congressional redistricting account and the legislative redistricting account created pursuant to subsection (2.5) of this section, money in the legislative department cash fund is continuously appropriated to the executive committee of the legislative council to pay for expenses of the legislative department of the state of Colorado. Money in the fund shall be expended consistent with any terms and conditions imposed as a condition of receiving such money as gifts, grants, or donations.

(2.5) (a) There are created in the legislative department cash fund the congressional redistricting account, referred to in this subsection (2.5) as the "congressional account", and the legislative redistricting account, referred to in this subsection (2.5) as the "legislative account". The congressional and legislative accounts are comprised of any money appropriated or transferred to the accounts and any money received by the independent congressional redistricting commission, created pursuant to section 44 of article V of the state constitution; the independent legislative redistricting commission, created pursuant to section 46 of article V of the state constitution; or the legislative council related to redistricting. Money in the congressional account is continuously appropriated to the independent congressional redistricting commission and to the legislative council staff to pay for the expense of redistricting the congressional districts in the state. Money in the legislative account is continuously appropriated to the independent legislative redistricting commission and to the legislative council staff to pay for the expense of redistricting the state legislative districts in the state. All interest earned on the investment of money in the accounts must be credited to the accounts. Any money credited to the accounts and unexpended at the end of any given fiscal year remains in the accounts and is not reverted or transferred to the general fund or any other fund; except that any unexpended money remaining in the accounts as of June 30 of any year ending in 2 must be transferred to the legislative department cash fund.

Repealed.

(2.6) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, any money appropriated from the general fund to the legislative department of the state government for any fiscal year commencing on or after July 1, 2011, that is unexpended or not encumbered as of the close of that fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund and shall be transferred by the state treasurer and the controller to the legislative department cash fund; except that, for the 2019-20 fiscal year, one million two hundred thousand dollars of the unencumbered and unexpended money that remains at the end of that fiscal year reverts to the general fund.

For purposes of this section, "legislative service agency" means the office of legislative legal services, legislative council staff, office of the state auditor, or staff of the joint budget committee.

Any money that is identified in a capital reserve of the legislative department cash fund created in subsection (1)(a) of this section or in a capital reserve of the redistricting account created in subsection (2.5) of this section as required pursuant to section 24-30-1310 on or before June 29, 2020, shall be released from said reserve or reserves and may be used instead for the purposes set forth in this section.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire part added, (HB 09-1348), ch. 358, p. 1865, § 4, effective June 1.

L. 2010:

(2) amended and (2.5) added, (HB 10-1210), ch. 352, p. 1635, § 7, effective August 11.

L. 2012:

(2.6) added, (HB 12-1301), ch. 283, p. 1640, § 3, effective March 8.

L. 2013:

(1) amended, (HB 13-1039), ch. 130, p. 433, § 1, effective April 19.

L. 2020:

(2.6) amended, (HB 20-1345), ch. 307, p. 1562, § 3, effective June 23; (4) added, (HB 20-1398), ch. 176, p. 807, § 2, effective June 29; (2) and (2.5) amended, (SB 20-186), ch. 272, p. 1328, § 15, effective July 11.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2.5)(b)(II) provided for the repeal of subsection (2.5)(b), effective July 1, 2022. (See L. 2020, p. 1328.)